Utah statutes.
35A-3-301.   Purpose -- Legislative intent.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  it is in the public interest to fundamentally alter the state's cash assistance program for needy families with children;

(b)  employment improves the quality of life for parents, children, and individuals by increasing family income, developing job skills, and improving self-esteem; and

(c)  the purpose of the cash assistance provided under this part is to assist a parent client to obtain employment that is sufficient to sustain a family, to ensure the dignity of those receiving assistance, and to strengthen families.

(2)  The Legislature recognizes that even with assistance, some clients may be unable to attain complete self-sufficiency.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 1997 General Session

